Florida, session 2026, SB1682.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âPresent subsections (5) and (6) of section 31 327.4107, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 32 and (7), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to that 33 section, to read: 34 327.4107âVessels at risk of becoming derelict on waters of 35 this state.â 36 (5)âA county or municipality may elect to administer, in 37 coordination with the commission, this section relating to the 38 identification, notice, corrective action, relocation, removal, 39 storage, destruction, or disposal of vessels at risk of becoming 40 derelict within its jurisdiction by adopting an ordinance to 41 that effect. 42 (a)âA county or municipality that adopts an ordinance under 43 this subsection: 44 1.âMay designate a code enforcement officer as defined in 45 s. 162.21 to determine whether a vessel meets one or more of the 46 at-risk conditions listed in subsection (2). The code 47 enforcement officerâs determination is for administrative 48 abatement purposes only and may be used solely to initiate 49 notice, corrective action, relocation, storage, disposal, or 50 cost-recovery actions pursuant to this section and in accordance 51 with rules adopted by the commission. The code enforcement 52 officerâs determination is not a criminal finding and may not 53 serve as a basis for prosecution under this section or any other 54 criminal violation relating to vessel conditions or derelict 55 vessels. 56 2.âShall comply with all notice, documentation, 57 environmental compliance, storage, and recordkeeping 58 requirements established by the commission and this section 59 before taking corrective action on a vessel. The commission may 60 provide technical assistance and guidance to the county or 61 municipality. 62 (b)âThis subsection may not be construed to prohibit a 63 county or municipality from coordinating with law enforcement 64 agencies for purposes of criminal investigation or prosecution 65 relating to violations of this chapter or chapter 823. A code 66 enforcement officer acting pursuant to this subsection may 67 provide documentation, photographs, observations, statements, 68 and other non-law enforcement support to a law enforcement 69 agency, but may not make a criminal determination or take any 70 action reserved for law enforcement officers under this chapter. 71 (c)âFor purposes of any commission-administered program 72 relating to the prevention, mitigation, removal, relocation, 73 storage, or destruction of vessels at risk of becoming derelict, 74 including the derelict vessel prevention program authorized 75 under subsection (7), a designation of a vessel as at risk of 76 becoming derelict by a county or municipal code enforcement 77 officer pursuant to this subsection must be treated, if the 78 county or municipality submits all documentation, photographic 79 evidence, and verification materials required by commission 80 rule, as equivalent to such a designation by a law enforcement 81 officer. 82 (d)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 83 subsection, including procedures for verifying administrative 84 designations, ensuring statewide consistency in the application 85 of at-risk criteria, maintaining records of corrective actions 86 or removals, providing technical assistance to local 87 governments, and auditing reimbursement or cost-recovery 88 requests. 89 Section 2.âPresent subsections (5) through (9) of section 90 327.4111, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 91 through (10), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to 92 that section, to read: 93 327.4111âLong-term anchoring.â 94 (5)âA county or municipality may elect to administer, in 95 coordination with the commission, this section relating to the 96 enforcement of long-term anchoring permit requirements within 97 its jurisdiction by adopting an ordinance to that effect. 98 (a)âA county or municipality that adopts an ordinance under 99 this subsection: 100 1.âMay designate a code enforcement officer as defined in 101 s. 162.21 to investigate, document, and cite violations of 102 subsection (4). A citation from a code enforcement officer is a 103 noncriminal infraction punishable as provided in s. 327.73 and 104 may be issued through local code enforcement procedures or the 105 uniform boating citation system under s. 327.74, as determined 106 by commission rule or local ordinance. A citation issued 107 pursuant to this subparagraph does not constitute a criminal 108 finding and may be used solely for the imposition of civil 109 penalties, corrective actions, or cost recovery authorized under 110 this chapter. 111 2.âShall comply with all permit verification, 112 documentation, notice, and recordkeeping requirements 113 established by the commission before a code enforcement officer 114 may issue a citation or take other enforcement action. The 115 commission may provide technical assistance, training, and 116 guidance to the county or municipality. 117 (b)âAdministrative enforcement under this subsection does 118 not preclude parallel enforcement by law enforcement officers 119 under s. 327.70. This subsection may not be construed to 120 prohibit a county or municipality from coordinating with law 121 enforcement agencies for purposes of criminal investigation or 122 prosecution relating to violations of this chapter or chapter 123 823. A code enforcement officer acting pursuant to this 124 subsection may provide documentation, photographs, observations, 125 statements, and other non-law enforcement support to a law 126 enforcement agency, but may not make a criminal determination or 127 take any action reserved for law enforcement officers under this 128 chapter. 129 (c)âFor purposes of any commission-administered program 130 relating to anchoring regulation, vessel compliance, or public 131 nuisance abatement, a noncriminal infraction citation for a 132 violation of subsection (4) issued by a county or municipal code 133 enforcement officer pursuant to this subsection must be treated, 134 if the county or municipality submits all documentation, 135 photographic evidence, location data, permit status 136 verification, and other materials required by commission rule, 137 as equivalent to a uniform boating citation issued by a law 138 enforcement officer. 139 (d)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 140 subsection, including procedures for local designation of code 141 enforcement officers, verifying compliance with permit 142 requirements, ensuring statewide consistency in enforcement 143 criteria, coordinating with the uniform boating citation system, 144 maintaining records of citations and resolutions, providing 145 technical assistance or training to counties or municipalities, 146 and auditing any reimbursement or cost-sharing requests. 147 Section 3.âPresent subsections (6) and (7) of section 148 823.11, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7) 149 and (8), respectively, a new subsection (6) is added to that 150 section, and paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of that section is 151 amended, to read: 152 823.11âDerelict and migrant vessels; relocation or removal; 153 penalty.â 154 (4) 155 (c)âThe commission may establish a program to provide 156 grants to local governments for the removal, storage, 157 destruction, and disposal of derelict vessels or migrant vessels 158 from the waters of this state. This grant funding may also be 159 used for the removal, storage, destruction, and disposal of 160 vessels declared a public nuisance pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa) 161 or the derelict vessel prevention program established pursuant 162 to s. 327.4107(8) s. 327.4107(7). The program must be funded 163 from the Marine Resources Conservation Trust Fund or the Florida 164 Coastal Protection Trust Fund. Notwithstanding s. 216.181(11), 165 funds available for these grants may only be authorized by 166 appropriations acts of the Legislature. In a given fiscal year, 167 if all funds appropriated pursuant to this paragraph are not 168 requested by and granted to local governments for the removal, 169 storage, destruction, and disposal of derelict vessels, migrant 170 vessels, or vessels declared a public nuisance pursuant to s. 171 327.73(1)(aa) by the end of the third quarter, the Fish and 172 Wildlife Conservation Commission may use the remainder of the 173 funds to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, or to pay 174 private contractors to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, 175 derelict vessels, migrant vessels, or vessels declared a public 176 nuisance pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa). The commission shall 177 adopt by rule procedures for local governments to submit a grant 178 application and criteria for allocating available funds. Such 179 criteria must include, at a minimum, all of the following: 180 1.âThe number of derelict vessels and migrant vessels 181 within the jurisdiction of the applicant. 182 2.âThe threat posed by such vessels to public health or 183 safety, the environment, navigation, or the aesthetic condition 184 of the general vicinity. 185 3.âThe degree of commitment of the local government to 186 maintain waters free of abandoned, derelict, and migrant vessels 187 and to seek legal action against those who abandon vessels in 188 the waters of this state as defined in s. 327.02. 189 (6)âA county or municipality may elect to administer, in 190 coordination with the commission, this section relating to the 191 identification, removal, storage, destruction, or disposal of 192 derelict vessels within its jurisdiction by adopting an 193 ordinance to that effect. 194 (a)âA county or municipality that adopts an ordinance under 195 this subsection: 196 1.âMay designate a code enforcement officer as defined in 197 s. 162.21 to determine whether a vessel meets the definition of 198 a derelict vessel as provided in this section for administrative 199 abatement purposes only. The code enforcement officerâs 200 determination is not a criminal finding and may not serve as the 201 basis for prosecution under this section. Such determinations 202 may be used solely to initiate notice, removal, disposal, and 203 cost-recovery actions pursuant to this section and in accordance 204 with rules adopted by the commission. 205 2.âShall comply with all notice, documentation, storage, 206 and environmental compliance requirements established by the 207 commission and this section before removing or disposing of a 208 vessel. The commission may provide technical assistance and 209 guidance to the county or municipality. 210 (b)âThis subsection may not be construed to prohibit a 211 county or municipality from coordinating with law enforcement 212 agencies for purposes of criminal investigation or prosecution 213 relating to violations of chapter 327 or this chapter. A code 214 enforcement officer acting pursuant to this subsection may 215 provide documentation, photographs, observations, statements, 216 and other non-law enforcement support to a law enforcement 217 agency but may not make a criminal determination or take any 218 action reserved for law enforcement officers under this chapter. 219 (c)âFor purposes of the Derelict Vessel Removal Grant 220 Program administered by the commission, a designation of a 221 vessel as derelict by a county or municipal code enforcement 222 officer under this subsection must be treated, if the county or 223 municipality submits the required documentation, photographic 224 evidence, and verification materials in accordance with 225 commission rules, as equivalent to such a designation by a law 226 enforcement officer. 227 (d)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 228 subsection, including procedures for verifying administrative 229 designations, maintaining records of removals, providing 230 technical assistance to local governments, and auditing 231 reimbursement requests. 232 Section 4.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 233 327.4108, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 234 327.4108âAnchoring of vessels in anchoring limitation 235 areas.â 236 (3) 237 (d)âA vessel upon the waters of this state and within 238 Monroe County for which the owner or occupant has established 239 the vessel as a domicile in accordance with s. 222.17 is exempt 240 from paragraph (a) until at least 60 100 new moorings are 241 available for public use within 1 mile of the Key West Bight 242 City Dock. Until such time, the commission shall designate the 243 area within 1 mile of the Key West Bight City Dock as a priority 244 for the investigation and removal of derelict vessels. 245 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.